New York, session 2025-2026, S3121.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 6305 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 604 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 8. Part-time and out-of-state students shall be charged such tuition 5 and fees as may be approved by the state university trustees. Any 6 student attending a community college who is a member or the spouse or 7 the dependent of a member of the armed forces of the United States on 8 full-time active duty and stationed in this state, or who have received 9 letters of acceptance to the military, whether or not a resident of this 10 state, shall be charged the tuition rate for residents as approved by 11 the state university trustees. Any student attending a community college 12 in accordance with the federal GI bills and in compliance with all 13 applicable eligibility requirements thereof, whether or not a resident 14 of this state, shall be charged the tuition rate for residents as 15 approved by the state university trustees. Any student attending a 16 community college who is the spouse or the dependent of a member of the 17 armed forces of the United States on full-time active duty and not 18 stationed in this state immediately following being stationed therein, 19 whether or not a resident of this state, shall be charged the tuition 20 rate for residents as approved by the state university trustees. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06969-01-5